Massachusetts, session 194th, H3994.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Paragraph (1) of section 48 of chapter 152 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the first sentence the following 3
sentences:- The employer shall be notified in writing of such payment by the insurer by way of a
lump sum agreement and shall have 30 days to consent in writing or object in writing to the lump
sum agreement. After the passage of 30 days, if the employer does not object or consent in
writing to the proposed lump sum agreement, then the employer’s consent is not required. In this
event the insurer shall file an affidavit, to be attached to the lump sum agreement papers as an
exhibit that states: (i) the employer has been notified of the proposed lump sum agreement; (ii)
no written objection has been received by the employer; and (iii) 30 days has passed from the
date of mailing of the notice to the employer.
of 1